North Carolina, session 2025, HB1018.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-58.1, as amended by Section 1 of S.L. 2025-14, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 160A-58.1. Petition for annexation; standards.
…
(b) A noncontiguous area proposed for annexation must meet all of the following
standards:
…
(5) The area within the proposed satellite corporate limits, when added to the area
within all other satellite corporate limits, may not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the area within the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.
This subdivision does not apply to the Cities of Archdale, Asheboro,
Belmont, Claremont, Concord, Conover, Durham, Elizabeth City, Gastonia,
Greenville, Hickory, Kannapolis, Kings Mountain, Locust, Lowell, Marion,
Mount Airy, Mount Holly, New Bern, Newton, Oxford, Randleman, Roanoke
Rapids, Rockingham, Saluda, Sanford, Salisbury, Shelby, Southport,
Statesville, and Washington and the Towns of Ahoskie, Angier, Apex, Ayden,
Belville, Benson, Bladenboro, Bridgeton, Bunn, Burgaw, Calabash, Carthage,
Catawba, China Grove, Clayton, Cleveland, Columbia, Columbus,
Cramerton, Creswell, Dallas, Dobson, Four Oaks, Franklin, Franklinton,
Franklinville, Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Godwin, Goldston, Granite Quarry,
Green Level, Grimesland, Harrisburg, Holly Ridge, Holly Springs,
Hookerton, Hope Mills, Huntersville, Jamestown, Kenansville, Kenly,
Knightdale, Landis, Laurel Park, Liberty, Lillington, Louisburg, Madison,
Maggie Valley, Maiden, Mayodan, Maysville, Middlesex, Midland,
Mocksville, Morrisville, Mount Pleasant, Nashville, North Wilkesboro,
Norwood, Oak Island, Oakboro, Ocean Isle Beach, Pembroke, Pine Level,
Pollocksville, Princeton, Ramseur, Ranlo, Richlands, Rockwell, Rolesville,
Rutherfordton, Shallotte, Siler City, Smithfield, Spencer, Spring Lake, Spruce
Pine, Stanley, Stem, Stovall, Surf City, Swansboro, Taylorsville, Troutman,
Troy, Vass, Wallace, Warsaw, Watha, Waynesville, Weldon, Wendell, West
Jefferson, Wilson's Mills, Windsor, Wingate, Yadkinville, Youngsville, and
Zebulon.
*H1018-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1018-Second Edition